test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AW_STEM_1.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AW_STEM_1 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AW_STEM_1

     sçáw+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sçáw
     sçáw+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçáwga
     sçáw+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw
     sçáw+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáwgang
     sçáw+V+DIRECT+PAST: sçáwgan
     sçáw+V+RELATIVE: sçáws
     sçáw+V+NON_FACTIVE: sçáwang
     sçáw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçáwgang
     sçáw+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçáwganggang
     sçáw+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçáwgangang
     sçáw+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáwgiinii
     sçáw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáwgaangaa
     sçáw+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáwgaangaan
     sçáw+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçáwäsaa
     sçáw+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçáwäs
     sçáw+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçáwäsaang
     sçáw+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçáwäsga
     sçáw+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçáwäsaas
     sçáw+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçáwäsaa.ang
     sçáw+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçáwang ñasa'áa
     sçáw+V+NEAR+FUTURE: sçáwang ñasa'áang
     sçáw+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçáwang ñasaasdláa
     sçáw+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçáwang ñasaasdláang
     sçáw+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçáw'uuj
     sçáw+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'uujang
     sçáw+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçáwäsaa'uujang
     sçáw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçáw'us
     sçáw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáw'ujaa
     sçáw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'uujaangaa
     sçáw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçáwäsaa'us
     sçáw+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçáwäsaa'ahlans
     sçáw+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçáwäseehl
     sçáw+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sçáw'uu
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçáw'waa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'waa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'waang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sçáw'wägan
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáw'aawaa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sçáw'aawaan
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sçáw'waas
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçáw'aawaas
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'waa.ang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'aawaa.ang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçáwgang'waa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçáwgang'waang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçáwgang'waa.ang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'wägiinii
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'wägaangaa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'wägaangaan
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçáw'waaäsaa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçáw'waaäs
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçáw'waaäsaang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçáw'waaäsga
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçáw'waaäsaas
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'waaäsaa.ang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçáw'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sçáw'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçáw'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçáw'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçáw'waa'uuj
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'waa'uujang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçáw'waaäsaa'uujang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçáw'waa'us
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáw'waa'ujaa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'waa'uujaangaa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçáw'waaäsaa'us
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçáw'waa'ahlanggang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sçáw'waa'ahlanggan
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçáw'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçáw'waa'ahlans
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçáw'aawaa'ahlang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçáw'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçáw'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sçáw'waa'ahl
     sçáw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçáw'waaäseehl
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sçáw'ang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçáw'angga
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'anggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: sçáw'anggan
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáw'aangaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: sçáw'aangaan
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: sçáw'ans
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçáw'aangaas
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'angang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'aangaa.ang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçáw'anggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçáwgang'anggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçáwgang'angang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'anggiinii
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'anggaangaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'anggaangaan
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçáw'angäsaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçáw'angäs
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçáw'angäsaang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçáw'angäsga
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçáw'angäsaas
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'angäsaa.ang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçáwang ñasaa'áng
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçáwang ñasaa'ánggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçáwang ñasaasdlä'áng
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçáwang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'uuj
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'uujang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçáw'angäsaa'uujang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'us
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáw'ang'ujaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'ang'uujaangaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçáw'angäsaa'us
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçáw'aang'ahlanggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: sçáw'aang'ahlanggan
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'aang'ahlanggiinii
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçáw'angäsaa'ahlans
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçáw'aang'ahlans
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçáw'aangaa'ahlang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçáw'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçáw'aangaa'ahlanggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: sçáw'aang'ahl
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçáw'angäseehl
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sçáw'ang'uu
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'waa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'waa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'waang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sçáw'ang'wägan
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáw'ang'aawaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sçáw'ang'aawaan
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sçáw'ang'waas
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçáw'ang'aawaas
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'ang'waa.ang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'ang'aawaa.ang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçáwgang'ang'waa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sçáwgang'ang'waang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sçáwgang'ang'waa.ang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'ang'wägiinii
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'ang'wägaangaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'ang'wägaangaan
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sçáw'ang'waaäsaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sçáw'ang'waaäs
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sçáw'ang'waaäsaang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sçáw'ang'waaäsga
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sçáw'ang'waaäsaas
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sçáw'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sçáw'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sçáw'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçáw'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sçáw'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'waa'uuj
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'waa'uujang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sçáw'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'waa'us
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáw'ang'waa'ujaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sçáw'ang'waaäsaa'us
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sçáw'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáw'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sçáw'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçáw'ang'waa'ahlans
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçáw'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçáw'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçáw'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sçáw'ang'waa'ahl
     sçáw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sçáw'ang'waaäseehl
